Maryland, session 2025, HB0124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
10–715.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY” MEANS PROPERTY IMPROVED BY
FOUR OR FEWER SINGLE–FAMILY DWELLING UNITS THAT ARE DESIGNED
PRINCIPALLY AND ARE INTENDED FOR HUMAN HABITATION.
(3) “WHOLESALE BUYER” MEANS A PERSON THAT ENTERS INTO A
CONTRACT OF SALE WITH AN OWNER OF OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY IN ORDER TO ASSIGN THE CONTRACT TO ANOTHER PERSON FOR A
MONETARY ASSIGNMENT FEE.
– 1 –

Ch. 508 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) “WHOLESALE SELLER” MEANS A PERSON THAT, WITHOUT
HOLDING LEGAL TITLE TO OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY:
(I) ENTERS INTO A CONTRACT OF SALE FOR THE PROPERTY;
AND
(II) ASSIGNS THE PERSON’S BENEFICIAL INTEREST IN THE
PROPERTY TO ANOTHER.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A SALE PROCEEDING UNDER §
14–215 OF THE MARYLAND RULES.
(C) (1) BEFORE ENTERING INTO A CONTRACT OF SALE FOR RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY, A WHOLESALE BUYER SHALL DISCLOSE IN WRITING TO THE OWNER OF
THE PROPERTY THAT THE WHOLESALE BUYER MAY ASSIGN THE CONTRACT OF SALE
TO ANOTHER PERSON.
(2) BEFORE ENTERING INTO ASSIGNING A CONTRACT OF SALE FOR
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, A WHOLESALE SELLER SHALL DISCLOSE IN WRITING TO A
PROSPECTIVE BUYER ASSIGNEE THAT THE WHOLESALE SELLER HOLDS AN
EQUITABLE INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY AND MAY NOT BE ABLE TO CONVEY TITLE
TO THE PROPERTY.
(D) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF A CONTRACT OF SALE OR ANY
OTHER AGREEMENT, AN OWNER OF RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY MAY RESCIND A
CONTRACT OF SALE TO A WHOLESALE BUYER, OR THE ASSIGNEE OR SUCCESSOR OF
A WHOLESALE BUYER, WITHOUT PENALTY AT ANY TIME BEFORE CLOSING IF THE
WHOLESALE BUYER:
(1) DOES NOT PROVIDE NOTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ASSIGNS THE CONTRACT OF SALE.
(E) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF A CONTRACT OF SALE OR
ANY OTHER AGREEMENT, A BUYER AN ASSIGNEE MAY RESCIND A THE AGREEMENT
TO PURCHASE UNDER THE ASSIGNED CONTRACT OF SALE FOR RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY WITHOUT PENALTY AT ANY TIME BEFORE CLOSING IF A WHOLESALE
SELLER DOES NOT PROVIDE NOTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 508
(2) A BUYER AN ASSIGNEE THAT RESCINDS A CONTRACT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS ENTITLED TO A REFUND OF ANY DEPOSIT
PAID FOR THE IN CONNECTION WITH THE ASSIGNMENT OF A CONTRACT OF SALE OF
THE RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY.
14–117.
(e) A contract of sale shall also comply with the following provisions, if applicable:
(22) Section 6–824 of the Environment Article (disclosure pertaining to
obligations to perform risk reduction); [and]
(23) Section 10–711 of this article (notice on zones of dewatering influence);
AND
(24) SECTION 10–715 OF THIS ARTICLE (DISCLOSURE PERTAINING TO
ASSIGNMENT OF CONTRACTS OF SALE BY WHOLESALE BUYERS AND WHOLESALE
SELLERS).
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any contracts of sale for residential property executed before the effective
date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –